Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-155
Board of equalization; counties under township organization; members; meetings.

In all cities of the second class in counties under township organization, the city council shall constitute a board of equalization for such city, whose duty it shall be to meet and equalize the assessments of such city at the same time and in the same manner as provided by law for townships in counties under township organization.

Laws 1889, c. 76, § 1, p. 537;

R.S.1913, § 5050;

C.S.1922, § 4219;

C.S.1929, § 17-158;

R.S.1943, § 17-155;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 44.